Maryland, session 2026, HB0971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0971*

HOUSE BILL 971
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(b) (1) As permitted by federal law or waiver, the Secretary may establish a
program under which Program recipients are required to enroll in managed care
organizations.
(27) (i) 1. The Department shall establish the Maryland Medicaid
Advisory Committee, composed of no more than 25 members.
2. The majority of the members of the Committee shall be
enrollees or enrollee advocates.
3. At least five members of the Committee shall be enrollees
representative of the entire Medicaid population.
(ii) The Committee members shall include:
1. At least five current or former enrollees or the parents or
guardians of current or former enrollees;
2. Providers who are familiar with the medical needs of
low–income population groups, including board–certified physicians;
3. Hospital representatives;
4. At least five but not more than 10 advocates for the
Medicaid population, including representatives of special needs populations, such as:
A. Children with special needs;
B. Individuals with physical disabilities;
C. Individuals with developmental disabilities;
D. Individuals with mental illness;
E. Individuals with brain injuries;
F. Medicaid and Medicare dual eligibles;
G. Individuals who are homeless or have experienced
homelessness;
H. Individuals enrolled in home– and community–based
services waivers;

HOUSE BILL 971 3
I. Elderly individuals;
J. Low–income individuals and individuals receiving
benefits through the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program; and
K. Individuals receiving substance abuse treatment services;
5. Two members of the Finance Committee of the Senate of
Maryland, appointed by the President of the Senate; and
6. Three members of the Maryland House of Delegates,
appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(iii) A designee of each of the following shall serve as an ex–officio
member of the Committee:
1. The Secretary of Human Services;
2. The Executive Director of the Maryland Health Care
Commission; and
3. The Maryland Association of County Health Officers.
(iv) In addition to any duties imposed by federal law and regulation,
the Committee shall:
1. Advise the Secretary on the implementation, operation,
and evaluation of managed care programs under this section;
2. Review and make recommendations on the regulations
developed to implement managed care programs under this section;
3. Review and make recommendations on the standards used
in contracts between the Department and managed care organizations;
4. Review and make recommendations on the Department’s
oversight of quality assurance standards;
5. Review data collected by the Department from managed
care organizations participating in the Program and data collected by the Maryland Health
Care Commission;
6. Promote the dissemination of managed care organization
performance information, including loss ratios, to enrollees in a manner that facilitates
quality comparisons and uses layman’s language;

HOUSE BILL 971
7. Assist the Department in evaluating the enrollment
process; [and]
8. Review reports of the ombudsmen; AND
9. FORM WORKGROUPS AND SUBCOMMITTEES AS
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study the Adoption of a Fee–for–Service Model for
All Medicaid Services.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) one representative of the Maryland Health Care Commission,
appointed by the Chair of the Commission; and
(4) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of Medicaid providers;
(ii) one representative of an advocacy organization that serves the
Medicaid population; and
(iii) any other member considered necessary by the Committee.
(c) The Maryland Medicaid Advisory Committee shall select the chair from
among the members of the Committee.
(d) The Maryland Medicaid Advisory Committee shall provide staff for the
Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:

HOUSE BILL 971 5
(1) review the experience of Connecticut in delivering Medicaid through a
fee–for–service model, including the revenue saved by moving away from managed care
organizations and the impact of the model on overall cost of care, provider participation,
and overall access to services;
(2) review the State’s experience using fee–for–service instead of managed
care organizations to manage and pay for care, including ease of coordination for agencies
and providers;
(3) examine any other states that have implemented a fee–for–service
model or are exploring a direct care model in their Medicaid programs in response to
decreased funding and enrollment changes set forth in federal legislation or regulation;
(4) review any evidence–based studies on the benefits of a direct care
payment model in Medicaid programs, including to enrollees, to the State’s access to
real–time data, maintenance of provider networks, and other relevant outcomes;
(5) examine the feasibility of implementing a direct care payment model
throughout the State’s Medicaid program; and
(6) propose a potential timeline for the State’s transition to a direct
payment model.
(g) On or before January 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Maryland Medicaid Advisory Committee and, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the
House of Delegates, the Senate Finance Committee, and the House Health Committee.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of
June 30, 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.